src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
@P.Stem.Nom@žestikulatsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žestikulatsi˘oon TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@žetoon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žet˘oon TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@žgutt+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žg˘utʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@žigull+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žig˘ulʲl TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Single@žiig+N:@P.Stem.Single@ž˘iig TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
žiiro+N:žiiro PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@žilett+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žil˘etʲt TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@žiraff+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žir˘aff TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@žirant+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žir˘anʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@žonglöör+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žongl˘öör TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@žoržett+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žorž˘etʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@žurnaal+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žurn˘aal TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@žurnalist+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žˈurnal˘ist TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
žurnalistika+N:žurnalˈisʲtika AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
žürii+N:žür˘ii ARMEE  "weight: 8 " ; 
kuulmetõri+N:k˘uulme%#tõr TÕRI  "weight: 11 " ; 
lapselaps+N: LAPSELAPS  "weight: 8 " ; 
lapselapselaps+N: LAPSELAPSELAPS  "weight: 11 " ; 
